Utah statutes.
17B-2a-304.   Additional fire protection district power.

In addition to the powers conferred on a fire protection district under Section 17B-1-103, a fire protection district may issue bonds as provided in and subject to Chapter 1, Part 11, Local District Bonds, to carry out the purposes of the district.

